Florida, session 2026, SB776.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âSubsections (5) through (8) are added to section 19 604.71, Florida Statutes, to read: 20 604.71âLocal regulation of vegetable gardens.â 21 (5)âA qualified patient as defined in s. 381.986 who is at 22 least 21 years of age may cultivate up to six flowering cannabis 23 plants at his or her residence for personal consumption and 24 noncommercial purposes. 25 (6)âA qualified patient as defined in s. 381.986 who is at 26 least 21 years of age may purchase medical marijuana seeds and 27 clones from a licensed medical marijuana treatment center. 28 (7)âA qualified patient who cultivates cannabis shall 29 ensure that the plants are secured in a manner to prevent access 30 by unauthorized persons. The personal consumption of cannabis 31 cultivated at a qualified patientâs residence is subject to the 32 limitations on medical use or administration of marijuana as 33 specified in s. 381.986(1)(k). 34 (8)âThe sale of patient-cultivated cannabis plants and 35 products and cultivation of cannabis by patients beyond the 36 limits specified in this section is subject to the penalties 37 outlined chapter 893. 38 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.